District of Columbia statutes.
4-325

Compacts authorized.

The Mayor is authorized to develop, participate in the development of, negotiate, and enter into one or more interstate compacts on behalf of the District with other states to protect children on behalf of whom adoption assistance is being provided by the District and to provide procedures for interstate children’s adoption assistance payments, including medical payments. When so entered into, and for so long as it shall remain in force, the compact shall have the force and effect of law.

June 27, 2000, D.C. Law 13-136, § 405, 47 DCR 2850